Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201466-912.01
Solar agreement; wind agreement;
initial term; limitation; termination.

A solar agreement or wind agreement shall run with the land
benefited and burdened and shall terminate upon the conditions stated in the
solar agreement or wind agreement. The initial term of a solar agreement or
wind agreement shall not exceed forty years, except that the parties to a
solar agreement or wind agreement may extend or renew the initial term by
mutual written agreement. A wind agreement shall terminate if development
of a wind energy conversion system has not commenced within ten years after
the effective date of the wind agreement, except that this period may be extended
by mutual agreement of the parties to the wind agreement.

Laws 2012, LB828, § 9.